Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB77.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 237.060 TO 237.090 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, ex parte orders issued in the
Commonwealth shall not prohibit a person from possessing, purchasing, selling, or
otherwise transferring firearms, ammunition, firearm accessories, holsters, or firearm
storage devices, nor compel a person to surrender his or her firearms, ammunition,
firearm accessories, holsters, or firearm storage devices.
Section 2. KRS 403.730 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The court shall review a petition for an order of protection immediately upon
its filing. If the review indicates that domestic violence and abuse exists, the
court shall summons the parties to an evidentiary hearing not more than
fourteen (14) days in the future. If the review indicates that such a basis does
not exist, the court may consider an amended petition or dismiss the petition
without prejudice.
(b) Service of the summons and hearing order under this subsection shall be made
upon the adverse party personally and may be made in the manner and by the
persons authorized to serve subpoenas under Rule 45.03 of the Rules of Civil
Procedure. A summons may be reissued if service has not been made on the
adverse party by the fixed court date and time.
(2) (a) If the review under this section also indicates the presence of an immediate
and present danger of domestic violence and abuse, the court shall, upon the
filing of the petition, issue ex parte an emergency protective order that:
1. Authorizes relief appropriate to the situation utilizing the alternatives set
out in KRS 403.740, other than awarding temporary support or
counseling;
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 9/5/2025 10:35 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 246
2. Sets forth which communications, if any, as requested by the petitioner,
are authorized and which communications are unauthorized;
3. Allows either party to retrieve his or her personal belongings from the
parties' shared residence and directs law enforcement to assist, if
requested;
4. Expires upon the conclusion of the evidentiary hearing required by this
section unless extended or withdrawn by subsequent order of the court;
and
5. Does not order or refer the parties to mediation unless requested by the
petitioner, and the court finds that:
a. The petitioner's request is voluntary and not the result of coercion;
and
b. Mediation is a realistic and viable alternative to or adjunct to the
issuance of an order sought by the petitioner.
[Nothing in ]This paragraph shall not be interpreted to place any restriction or
restraint on the petitioner.
(b) An order issued under this subsection shall not prohibit a person from
possessing, purchasing, selling, or otherwise transferring firearms,
ammunition, firearm accessories, holsters, or firearm storage devices, nor
compel a person to surrender his or her firearms, ammunition, firearm
accessories, holsters, or firearm storage devices.
(c) If an order is not issued under this subsection, the court shall note on the
petition, for the record, any action taken or denied and the reason for it.
Section 3. KRS 456.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The court shall review a petition for an interpersonal protective order
immediately upon its filing. If the review indicates that dating violence and
abuse, stalking, or sexual assault exists, the court shall summons the parties to
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 9/5/2025 10:35 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 246
an evidentiary hearing not more than fourteen (14) days in the future. If the
review indicates that such a basis does not exist, the court may consider an
amended petition or dismiss the petition without prejudice.
(b) Service of the summons and hearing order under this subsection shall be made
upon the adverse party personally and may be made in the manner and by the
persons authorized to serve subpoenas under Rule 45.03 of the Rules of Civil
Procedure. A summons may be reissued if service has not been made on the
adverse party by the fixed court date and time.
(2) (a) If the review under this section also indicates the presence of an immediate
and present danger of dating violence and abuse, sexual assault, or stalking,
the court shall, upon the filing of the petition, issue ex parte a temporary
interpersonal protective order that:
1. Authorizes relief appropriate to the situation utilizing the alternatives set
out in KRS 456.060;
2. Sets forth which communications, if any, as requested by the petitioner,
are authorized and which communications are unauthorized;
3. Expires upon the conclusion of the evidentiary hearing required by this
section unless extended or withdrawn by subsequent order of the court;
and
4. Does not order or refer the parties to mediation unless requested by the
petitioner, and the court finds that:
a. The petitioner's request is voluntary and not the result of coercion;
and
b. Mediation is a realistic and viable alternative to or adjunct to the
issuance of an order sought by the petitioner.
[Nothing in ]This paragraph shall not be interpreted to place any restriction or
restraint on the petitioner.
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 9/5/2025 10:35 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 246
(b) An order issued under this subsection shall not prohibit a person from
possessing, purchasing, selling, or otherwise transferring firearms,
ammunition, firearm accessories, holsters, or firearm storage devices, nor
compel a person to surrender his or her firearms, ammunition, firearm
accessories, holsters, or firearm storage devices.
(c) If an order is not issued under this subsection, the court shall note on the
petition, for the record, any action taken or denied and the reason for it.
Section 4. This Act may be cited as the Red Flag Repeal Act of 2026.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 9/5/2025 10:35 AM Jacketed